Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.051

Foreign professional limited liability company.

A foreign professional limited liability company may render professional services in this state so long as it complies with Article IX of this chapter and each individual rendering professional services in this state is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this state.

[ 2015 c 188 s 15.]